Nevada, session 83, AB588.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218A.670 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218A.670 1. At each regular session, each Legislator is
entitled to receive at the expense of the Legislative Fund:
(a) Not to exceed 2,000 letterheads, 8 1/2 inches x 11 inches,
and 2,000 half size, or 4,000 of either variety;
(b) Not to exceed 2,000 No. 10 envelopes and 2,000 No. 6 3/4
envelopes, or 4,000 of either variety; and
(c) Not to exceed 2,000 business cards and 1,000 memorandum
sheets, 500 each of the small and large type or 1,000 of either type.
2. [Each female member of the Assembly is entitled to have the
word “Assemblywoman” precede the inscription of her name on her
official stationery and business cards.
3.] All orders for the printing specified in subsection 1 must be
placed by Legislators with the Director, who shall approve those
claims which comply with the provisions of this section and shall
pay the claims from the Legislative Fund.
[4.] 3. A Legislator may purchase official stationery, cards and
other material appropriate to the Legislator’s official duties in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
excess of that specified in subsection 1 at the Legislator’s own
expense and may purchase stationery, cards or other material for use
after the Legislator leaves office if the stationery, cards or other
material clearly identifies the person as a former Legislator or
retired Legislator.
Sec. 2. NRS 35.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
35.010 A civil action may be brought in the name of the State:
1. Against a person who usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully
holds or exercises, a public office, civil or military, except the office
of [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or State
Senator, or a franchise, within this state, or an officer in a
corporation created by the authority of this state.
2. Against a public officer, civil or military, except the office
of [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or State
Senator, who does or suffers an act which, by the provisions of law,
works a forfeiture of the office.
3. Against an association of persons who act as a corporation
within this state without being legally incorporated.
Sec. 3. NRS 35.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
35.050 A person claiming to be entitled to a public office,
except the office of [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman]
Assemblymember or State Senator, unlawfully held and exercised
by another may, by himself or herself or by an attorney and
counselor at law, bring an action therefor in the name of the State, as
provided in this chapter. On filing the complaint, such person shall
enter into an undertaking with two sufficient sureties, to be
approved by the judge, or any judge of the court in which the action
is brought, conditioned that such person will pay any judgment for
costs or damages recovered against the person, and all costs and
expenses incurred in the prosecution of the action, which
undertaking shall be filed with the clerk of the court.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.109 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.109 “State officer” means:
1. The Governor;
2. The Lieutenant Governor;
3. The Secretary of State;
4. The State Treasurer;
5. The State Controller;
6. The Attorney General;
7. A justice of the Supreme Court;
8. A judge of the Court of Appeals;
9. A State Senator;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
10. A State [Assemblyman or Assemblywoman;]
Assemblymember;
11. A regent of the University of Nevada;
12. A member of the State Board of Education; or
13. A district judge.
Sec. 5. NRS 293.166 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.166 1. A vacancy occurring in a party nomination for the
office of State Senator [, Assemblyman] or [Assemblywoman]
Assemblymember from a legislative district comprising more than
one county may be filled as follows, subject to the provisions of
subsections 2, 3 and 4. The county commissioners of each county,
all or part of which is included within the legislative district, shall
meet to appoint a person who is of the same political party as the
former nominee and who actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in the district to fill the vacancy, with the chair of the board
of county commissioners of the county whose population residing
within the district is the greatest presiding. Each board of county
commissioners shall first meet separately and determine the single
candidate it will nominate to fill the vacancy. Then, the boards shall
meet jointly and the chairs on behalf of the boards shall cast a
proportionate number of votes according to the percent, rounded to
the nearest whole percent, which the population of its county is of
the population of the entire district. Populations must be determined
by the last decennial census or special census conducted by the
Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of
Commerce. The person who receives a plurality of these votes is
appointed to fill the vacancy. If no person receives a plurality of the
votes, the boards of county commissioners of the respective counties
shall each as a group select one candidate, and the nominee must be
chosen by drawing lots among the persons so selected.
2. If a vacancy occurs in a party nomination for the office of
State Senator [, Assemblyman] or [Assemblywoman]
Assemblymember from a legislative district comprising more than
one county after the primary election and before 5 p.m. on the fourth
Friday in July of the year in which the general election is held and:
(a) The vacancy occurs because the nominee dies or is
adjudicated insane or mentally incompetent, the vacancy may be
filled pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1.
(b) The vacancy occurs for a reason other than the reasons
described in paragraph (a), the nominee’s name must remain on the
ballot for the general election and, if elected, a vacancy exists.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
3. No change may be made on the ballot for the general
election after 5 p.m. on the fourth Friday in July of the year in which
the general election is held. If, after that time and date:
(a) A nominee dies or is adjudicated insane or mentally
incompetent; or
(b) A vacancy in the nomination is otherwise created,
 the nominee’s name must remain on the ballot for the general
election and, if elected, a vacancy exists.
4. Each designation of a candidate provided for in this section
must be filed with the appropriate filing officer before 5 p.m. on the
fourth Friday in July of the year in which the general election is
held. In each case, the candidate must file a declaration of candidacy
with the appropriate filing officer and pay the filing fee required by
NRS 293.193 before 5 p.m. on the date the designation is filed.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.181 1. A candidate for the office of State Senator [,
Assemblyman] or [Assemblywoman] Assemblymember must
execute and file, with his or her declaration of candidacy, a
declaration of residency which must be in substantially the
following form:
I, the undersigned, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I have been a citizen resident of this State as
required by NRS 218A.200; that I understand that knowingly
and willfully filing a declaration of residency which contains
a false statement is a crime punishable as a gross
misdemeanor and also subjects me to a civil action
disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of the office;
and that I have actually, as opposed to constructively, resided
at the following residence or residences since November 1 of
the preceding year:
......................................... ........................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ........................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ........................................
State State
From ............ To ........... From ........... To ............
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
......................................... ........................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ........................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ........................................
State State
From ............ To ........... From ........... To ............
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
(Attach additional sheet or sheets of residences as necessary)
2. Each address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of residency pursuant to subsection 1 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resided or resides in accordance with NRS 281.050,
if one has been assigned. The declaration of residency must not be
accepted for filing if any of the candidate’s addresses are listed as a
post office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence.
3. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of residency which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.185 A declaration of candidacy must be filed with the
appropriate filing officer, during regular office hours, as follows:
1. For United States Senator, Representative in Congress,
statewide offices, State Senators [, Assemblymen] and
[Assemblywomen] Assemblymembers to be elected from districts
comprising more than one county, and all other offices whose
districts comprise more than one county, with the Secretary of State.
2. For Representative in Congress and district offices voted for
wholly within one county, State Senators [, Assemblymen] and
[Assemblywomen] Assemblymembers to be elected from districts
comprising but one or part of one county, county and township
officers, with the county clerk.
Sec. 8. NRS 293.193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.193 1. Fees as listed in this section for filing declarations
of candidacy must be paid to the filing officer by cash, cashier’s
check or certified check.
United States Senator ....................................................... $500
Representative in Congress ................................................ 300
Governor ............................................................................. 300
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Justice of the Supreme Court ............................................ $300
Any state office, other than Governor or justice
of the Supreme Court .................................................... 200
District judge ...................................................................... 150
Justice of the peace ............................................................. 100
Any county office ............................................................... 100
State Senator ....................................................................... 100
[Assemblyman or Assemblywoman]
Assemblymember .......................................................... 100
Any district office other than district judge .......................... 30
Constable or other town or township office ......................... 30
For the purposes of this subsection, trustee of a county school
district, hospital or hospital district is not a county office.
2. No filing fee may be required from a candidate for an office
the holder of which receives no compensation.
3. The county clerk shall pay to the county treasurer all filing
fees received from candidates. The county treasurer shall deposit the
money to the credit of the general fund of the county.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.194, a filing fee
paid pursuant to this section is not refundable.
Sec. 9. NRS 293.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.207 1. Election precincts must be established on the
basis of the number of registered voters therein, with a maximum of
5,000 registered voters who are not designated inactive pursuant to
NRS 293.530 per precinct in those precincts in which a mechanical
voting system is used.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the
county clerk may consolidate two or more contiguous election
precincts into a single voting district to conduct a particular election
as public convenience, necessity and economy may require.
3. If a county clerk proposes to consolidate two or more
contiguous election precincts, in whole or in part, pursuant to
subsection 2, the county clerk shall, at least 14 days before
consolidating the precincts, cause notice of the proposed
consolidation to be:
(a) Posted in the manner prescribed for a regular meeting of the
board of county commissioners; and
(b) Mailed to each [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman,]
Assemblymember, State Senator, county commissioner and, if
applicable, member of the governing body of a city who represents
residents of a precinct affected by the consolidation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
4. A person may file a written objection to the proposed
consolidation with the county clerk. The county clerk shall consider
each written objection filed pursuant to this subsection before
consolidating the precincts.
Sec. 10. NRS 293.407 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.407 1. A candidate at any election, or any registered
voter of the appropriate political subdivision, may contest the
election of any candidate, except for the office of United States
Senator or Representative in Congress.
2. Except where the contest involves the general election for
the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, [Assemblyman,
Assemblywoman,] Assemblymember, State Senator, justice of the
Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals, a candidate or
voter who wishes to contest an election, including election to the
office of presidential elector, must, within the time prescribed in
NRS 293.413 or 293.424, file with the clerk of the district court a
written statement of contest, setting forth:
(a) The name of the contestant and that the contestant is a
registered voter of the political subdivision in which the election to
be contested or part of it was held;
(b) The name of the defendant;
(c) The office to which the defendant was declared elected;
(d) The particular grounds of contest and the section of Nevada
Revised Statutes pursuant to which the statement is filed; and
(e) The date of the declaration of the result of the election and
the body or board which canvassed the returns thereof.
3. The contestant shall verify the statement of contest in the
manner provided for the verification of pleadings in civil actions.
4. All material regarding a contest filed by a contestant with
the clerk of the district court must be filed in triplicate.
5. The contestant must notify the defendant that a statement of
contest has been filed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 11. NRS 293.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.425 1. If the contest is of the general election for the
office of [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or
Senator, a statement of contest, prepared as provided in NRS
293.407, and all depositions, ballots and other documents relating to
the contest must be filed with the Secretary of State within the time
provided for the filing of statements of contests with the clerk of the
district court. The parties to such a contest shall be designated
contestant and defendant. The contestant and the Secretary of State
shall notify the defendant that a statement of contest and documents
have been filed by the contestant pursuant to this section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2. On or before December 15 of the year immediately
preceding a regular legislative session:
(a) The contestant in a contest of a general election for the office
of [Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or Senator
may amend the statement of contest filed pursuant to this section by
filing an amended statement of contest and any relevant depositions,
ballots and other documents relating to the contest with the
Secretary of State; and
(b) Each party in a contest of a general election for the office of
[Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or Senator
shall provide the Secretary of State with a list of the witnesses the
party intends to present at the hearing of the contest.
3. Each party in a contest of a general election for the office of
[Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or Senator
may:
(a) Before the hearing of the contest:
(1) Take the deposition of any witness in the manner
prescribed by rule of court for taking depositions in civil actions in
the district courts; and
(2) Investigate issues relating to the contest; and
(b) At the hearing of the contest, present any relevant
depositions and other evidence obtained as a result of such
investigation at the hearing of the contest, including, without
limitation, evidence obtained after the date for filing an amended
statement of contest. If a party obtains evidence after such date, the
evidence may not be included in the statement of contest or
amended statement of contest.
Sec. 12. NRS 293.427 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.427 1. The Secretary of State shall deliver the statement
of contest filed pursuant to NRS 293.425 and all other documents,
including any amendments to the statement, to the presiding officer
of the appropriate house of the Legislature on the day of the
organization of the Legislature.
2. Until the contest has been decided, the candidate who
received the highest number of votes for the office in the contested
election must be seated as a member of the appropriate house.
3. If, before the contest has been decided, a contestant gives
written notice to the Secretary of State that the contestant wishes to
withdraw his or her statement of contest, the Secretary of State shall
dismiss the contest.
4. The contest, if not dismissed, must be heard and decided as
prescribed by the standing or special rules of the house in which the
contest is to be tried. If after hearing the contest, the house decides
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
to declare the contestant elected, the Governor shall execute a
certificate of election and deliver it to the contestant. The certificate
of election issued to the other candidate is thereafter void.
5. In a contest of a general election for the office of
[Assemblyman, Assemblywoman] Assemblymember or Senator, the
house in which a contest was tried or was to be tried shall determine
the remedy, if any, to be awarded to a party to such a contest. The
remedy may include, without limitation, any costs incurred by a
party in connection with the contest.
Sec. 13. NRS 482.374 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.374 1. Except as otherwise provided in a special act, the
Department shall furnish to each State Senator [,] and State
[Assemblyman and State Assemblywoman] Assemblymember a
special license plate or plates showing on the face thereof, in the
case of the Senators, “State Senator,” together with the designated
number showing the seniority of the Senator in the Senate, and, in
the case of the members of the Assembly, “State [Assemblyman” or
“State Assemblywoman,”] Assemblymember” as appropriate,
together with the designated number showing the seniority of that
member in the Assembly. If two or more Legislators have the same
seniority, the designated number given to them must be determined
according to the alphabetical order of their last names, except that
numbers drawn by lot by Legislators having the same seniority
before January 1, 1971, must be maintained in the same sequence.
2. The Department shall furnish to each justice of the Supreme
Court a special license plate or plates showing on the face thereof
“Supreme Court Justice,” together with the designated number
showing the seniority of the justice. If two or more justices have the
same seniority, the designated number given to them must be
determined according to the alphabetical order of their last names.
3. The Department shall furnish to each judge of the Court of
Appeals a special license plate or plates showing on thereof “Court
of Appeals Judge,” together with the designated number showing
the seniority of the judge. If two or more judges have the same
seniority, the designated number given to them must be determined
according to the alphabetical order of their last names.
4. The Department shall issue the license plates described in
this section and a duplicate set of those plates to the State
Legislators, judges of the Court of Appeals and justices of the
Supreme Court upon payment of the license fees set forth in
NRS 482.3745.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Sec. 14. Section 1.090 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 341, Statutes of Nevada 1999, as last amended by chapter
359, Statutes of Nevada 2013, at page 1873, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 1.090 Charter Committee: Officers; meetings;
duties; legislative measures.
1. The Charter Committee shall:
(a) Elect from among its members a Chair and Vice
Chair, who each serve for a term of 2 years unless he or she
resigns or is removed from the Committee pursuant to
section 1.100;
(b) Meet at least once every 2 years before the beginning
of each regular session of the Legislature and when requested
by the Board or the Chair of the Committee;
(c) Meet jointly with the Board on a date to be set after
the final biennial meeting of the Committee is conducted
pursuant to paragraph (b) and before the beginning of the next
regular session of the Legislature to advise the Board with
regard to the recommendations of the Committee concerning
necessary amendments to this Charter;
(d) If the Board elects to submit the Committee’s
recommended amendments to the Legislature as one of the
City’s legislative measures, assist the Board in the timely
preparation of such amendments for presentation to the
Legislature on behalf of the City; and
(e) Perform all functions and do all things necessary to
accomplish the purposes for which it is established, including
holding meetings and public hearings and obtaining
assistance from officers of the City to ensure the Committee’s
compliance with any law applicable to a public body.
2. If the Board elects not to submit the Committee’s
recommended amendments to the Legislature as one of the
City’s legislative measures, the Committee may vote to
authorize a member of the Committee to seek sponsorship of
a legislative measure by a member of the Senate or Assembly
delegation representing the residents of the City and to assist
the Senator [, Assemblyman] or [Assemblywoman,]
Assemblymember, as applicable, in the timely preparation of
such amendments for presentation to the Legislature. The
member of the Committee shall not represent that any such
legislative measure is approved or supported by the Board
and shall disclose to the Senator [, Assemblyman] or
[Assemblywoman,] Assemblymember, as applicable, that the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
legislative measure is not approved or supported by the
Board.
Sec. 15. Section 1.120 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1868, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 1.120 Charter Committee: Officers; meetings;
duties; legislative measures.
1. The Charter Committee shall:
(a) Elect from among its members a Chair and Vice
Chair, who each serve a term of 2 years unless he or she
resigns or is removed from the Committee pursuant to
section 1.130;
(b) Meet at least once every 2 years before the beginning
of each regular session of the Legislature and when requested
by the City Council or the Chair of the Committee;
(c) Meet jointly with the City Council on a date to be set
after the final biennial meeting of the Committee is conducted
pursuant to paragraph (b) and before the beginning of the next
regular session of the Legislature to advise the City Council
with regard to the recommendations of the Committee
concerning necessary amendments to this Charter;
(d) If the City Council elects to submit the Committee’s
recommended amendments to the Legislature as one of the
City’s legislative measures, assist the City Council in the
timely preparation of such amendments for presentation to
the Legislature on behalf of the City; and
(e) Perform all functions and do all things necessary to
accomplish the purposes for which it is established, including,
without limitation, holding meetings and public hearings and
obtaining assistance from officers of the City to ensure the
Committee’s compliance with any law applicable to a public
body.
2. If the City Council elects not to submit the
Committee’s recommended amendments to the Legislature as
one of the City’s legislative measures, the Committee may
vote to authorize a member of the Committee to seek
sponsorship of a legislative measure by a member of the
Senate or Assembly delegation representing the residents of
the City and to assist the Senator [, Assemblyman] or
[Assemblywoman,] Assemblymember, as applicable, in the
timely preparation of such amendments for presentation to the
Legislature. The member of the Committee shall not
represent that any such legislative measure is approved or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
supported by the City Council and shall disclose to the
Senator [, Assemblyman] or [Assemblywoman,]
Assemblymember, as applicable, that the legislative measure
is not approved or supported by the City Council.
Sec. 16. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 482.374, as
amended by section 13 of this act, the Department of Motor
Vehicles is not required to furnish any special license plate showing
on the face thereof the title of “Assemblymember” until after the
2026 general election.
Sec. 17. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)